Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1265
Local regulation; special rules and regulations.

Any subdivision of this state may at any time, but only after public notice, make formal application to the commission for special rules and regulations with reference to the operation of vessels on any waters within its territorial limits and shall set forth therein the reasons which make such special rules or regulations necessary or appropriate.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 65.